Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3557
Hospital districts; bonds; issuance; election; polling places; ballots; counting.

In all elections at which the registered voters of hospital districts are voting on the question of issuing bonds of the district, the board of directors shall designate the polling places, prepare the form of ballot, and appoint the election officials. Ballots for early voting shall be issued by the secretary of the board of directors in the same manner as provided in the Election Act and returned to the secretary. All ballots cast at the election shall be counted by the same board. When all the ballots have been counted, the returns of such election shall be turned over to the board of directors of the district in which the election was held for the purpose of making a canvass thereof.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 4, p. 353;

Laws 1984, LB 920, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.52;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 548;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 2.

Election Act, see section 32-101.